South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4066.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 50-11-310(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 50-11-310. (A) The open season for the hunting and taking of antlered deer is: (1) In Game Zone 1: October 1 through October 10, with primitive weapons only; October 11 through January 1 January 15, with archery equipment and firearms. (2) In Game Zone 2:  September 15 through September 30, with archery equipment only; October 1 through October 10, with primitive weapons only; October 11 through January 1 January 15, with archery equipment and firearms. (3) In Game Zone 3: August 15 through January 1, with archery equipment and firearms. (4) In Game Zone 4: August 15 through August 31, with archery equipment; and September 1 through January 1, with archery equipment and firearms. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----